Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB736.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 314 of the act of June 28, 1995 (P.L.89, No.18), known as the Conservation and Natural Resources Act, is amended to read:Section 314. Fees and charges.(a) Imposition.--Whenever the department imposes fees or charges for activities, admissions, uses or privileges, including charges for concessions, at or relating to State parks, such charges or fees shall be used solely for the 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 acquisition, maintenance, operation or administration of the State park system and are hereby appropriated for such purposes. The department shall not adopt or impose any charges or fees for parking or general admission to State parks unless the charges were imposed prior to January 1, 1995. The department may continue to impose and modify parking charges and fees applicable to specific services or units within the State park system which were imposed prior to January 1, 1995, and may impose charges or fees for admission to and for use of specific services and facilities in State parks. The department shall continue to exercise the powers previously vested in the Environmental Quality Board regarding the imposition of fees and charges for State parks and State forests.(b) Discount.-- (1) Upon presenting proper identification in a manner determined by the department, the department shall provide a discount of 15% on all fees and charges assessed by the department for activities, admissions, uses or privileges, including charges for concessions, at or relating to State parks to:(i) An active duty member of the United States Armed Forces.(ii) A veteran who served in the United States Armed Forces, including a reserve component or the National Guard, and who was discharged or released from service under conditions other than dishonorable.(iii) An immediate family member of an individual listed under subparagraph (i) or (ii).(2) As used in this subsection, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this 20250SB0736PN0801 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 paragraph unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Immediate family member." A spouse, parent or child.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0736PN0801 - 3 - 123